Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 12. County Organization

§ 1. Existing counties remain such.

The several counties in the Territory of Wyoming as they shall exist at the time of the admission of said territory as a state, are hereby declared to be counties of the State of Wyoming.

Cross references. —

As to counties generally, see title 18.

Judicial notice will be taken of the organization of the counties

of the state. State ex rel. Sullivan v. Schnitger, 16 Wyo. 479, 95 P. 698,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1908).

County must sue and be sued in the name of the board of commissioners

of the county. Board Comm'rs Sweetwater County v. Young, 3 Wyo. 684, 29 P. 1002,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1892).

Big Horn county

was not organized before the adoption of the constitution and proceedings for its organization could not be taken until it had a population of 1,500. Board of Comm'rs v. Perkins, 5 Wyo. 166, 38 P. 915,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1895).

Applied

in

State ex rel. Fawcett v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 69, 273 P.2d 188,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1954).

Cited

in

MTM v. LD, 2002 WY 26, 41 P.3d 522,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Constitution: A Centennial Assessment,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 13 (1991).

§ 2. Organization of new counties.

The legislature shall provide by general law for organizing new counties, locating the county seats thereof temporarily and changing county lines. But no new county shall be formed unless it shall contain within the limits thereof property of the valuation of two million dollars, as shown by last preceding tax returns, and not then unless the remaining portion of the old county or counties shall each contain property of at least three million dollars of assessable valuation; and no new county shall be organized nor shall any organized county be so reduced as to contain a population of less than one thousand five hundred bona fide inhabitants, and in case any portion of an organized county or counties is stricken off to form a new county, the new county shall assume and be holden for an equitable proportion of the indebtedness of the county or counties so reduced. No county shall be divided unless a majority of the qualified electors of the territory proposed to be cut off voting on the proposition shall vote in favor of the division.

Cross references. —

As to organization of new counties, see §§

18-1-301

to

18-1-320

.

New county formed from territory of existing county. —

A new county may be formed out of the territory forming a part of an existing county. Board of Comm'rs v. Woods, 18 Wyo. 316, 106 P. 923,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 18 Wyo. 316, 107 P. 753,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1910).

Additional requirements permitted. —

This section was cited in connection with the proposition that a legislature may set requirements additional to those set up as the minimum by the constitution. State ex rel. Voiles v. Johnson County High Sch., 43 Wyo. 494, 5 P.2d 255,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1931).

Sections

18-1-301

to

18-1-303

are a valid exercise of legislative power

to provide by general law for the organization of new counties under this section.
Budge v. Board of Comm'rs, 29 Wyo. 35, 208 P. 874,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1922).

Curative statute legalizing defective organization of county

was not invalid as special act organizing county or regulating its affairs or interfering with uniform operation of general laws. State ex rel. Budge v. Snyder, 30 Wyo. 287, 219 P. 735,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1923).

Act creating Big Horn county is not in conflict with this section,

as the constitutional provision acts prospectively only, and was adopted subsequent to said section. Board of Comm'rs v. Perkins, 5 Wyo. 166, 38 P. 915,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1895).

Elections. —

Provision in an act creating Platte county, providing that it should be considered for election purposes as attached to Laramie county until the officers had qualified, was held to mean elections that would be held in the old county and not to the election on the organization of the new county. Dillman v. State, 20 Wyo. 404, 125 P. 367,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1912).

Act providing that only taxpayers could vote at a bond election was unconstitutional. Simpkin v. Rock Springs, 33 Wyo. 166, 237 P. 245,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1925).

Applied

in

State ex rel. Fawcett v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 69, 273 P.2d 188,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1954).

Stated

in

Lund v. Schrader, 492 P.2d 202,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1971).

Cited

in

In re Fremont County, 8 Wyo. 1, 54 P. 1073,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(1898); State ex rel. Sullivan v. Schnitger, 16 Wyo. 479, 95 P. 698,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(1908).

§ 3. Changing county seats.

The legislature shall provide by general law for changing county seats in organized counties, but it shall have no power to remove the county seat of any organized county.

Cross references. —

For enumeration of county seats, see §

18-1-201

.

§ 4. Township organization.

The legislature shall provide by general law for a system of township organization and government, which may be adopted by any county whenever a majority of the citizens thereof voting at a general election shall so determine.

Bond election. —

A statute providing that only taxpayers can vote at a bond election was unconstitutional. Simpkin v. Rock Springs, 33 Wyo. 166, 237 P. 245,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1925).

§ 5. County officers.

The legislature shall provide by law for the election of such county officers as may be necessary.

Cross references. —

As to county officers generally, see §§

18-3-101

to

18-3-907

.

As to Election Code, see title 22.

County assessors are not constitutional officers,

so that the legislature may abolish any of the duties of the office or change the duties to be performed. Reals v. Smith, 8 Wyo. 159, 56 P. 690,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1899).

Cited

in

In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

Cited

in

MTM v. LD, 2002 WY 26, 41 P.3d 522,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2002).